Utah statutes.
72-8-103.   Designated county and municipal sidewalks -- Construction on
easements granted by transportation department.
(1) All sidewalks, including curbs and gutters within the unincorporated areas
of a county and within nonparticipating municipalities situated within the
county, are designated county sidewalks. All sidewalks within participating
municipalities are designated municipal sidewalks.
(2) Counties and participating municipalities may construct and maintain
curbs, gutters, sidewalks, and pedestrian safety devices adjacent to the
traveled portion of state highways upon easements that may be granted by the
department. The department shall cooperate with counties and participating
municipalities to accomplish pedestrian safety construction and maintenance.
(3)  A county or municipality may construct and maintain pedestrian safety
devices on state highways in compliance with rules made by the department.
